Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3888.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168B.16, is amended to read: 168B.16 FLASHING LIGHTnew text begin AND VARIABLE MESSAGE SIGNnew text end ON TOW TRUCK. new text begin (a) new text end A tow truck or towing vehicle must be equipped with flashing or intermittent red and amber lights of a type approved by the commissioner of public safety. The lights must be placed on the dome of the vehicle at the highest practicable point visible from a distance of 500 feet. The flashing red light must be displayed only when the tow truck or towing vehicle is engaged in emergency service on or near the traveled portion of a highway. The flashing amber light may be displayed when the tow truck or towing vehicle is moving a disabled vehicle. new text begin (b) A tow truck or towing vehicle may display a portable variable message sign mounted on the tow truck while performing emergency service on or near the traveled portion of a highway. The portable variable message sign must conform to the standards established in the Minnesota Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices. new text end